Illinois, session 104th, SB835.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Act on the Aging is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 105/1)  (from Ch. 23, par. 6101)7    Sec. 1. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as the 8"Illinois Act on the Aging".9(Source: P.A. 78-242.)